Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.480

Action by boards.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, an ethics board may order payment of the following amounts if it finds a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it after a hearing under RCW 42.52.370 or other applicable law:

(a) Any damages sustained by the state that are caused by the conduct constituting the violation;

(b) From each such person, a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars per violation or three times the economic value of any thing received or sought in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it, whichever is greater; and

(c) Costs, including reasonable investigative costs, which shall be included as part of the limit under (b) of this subsection. The costs may not exceed the penalty imposed. The payment owed on the penalty shall be reduced by the amount of the costs paid.

(2) Damages under this section may be enforced in the same manner as a judgment in a civil case.

[ 1994 c 154 s 218.]